Massachusetts, session 194th, H1975.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 210 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, in line 49, the words “state or the country where it was
executed” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- commonwealth or the laws of the
place where it was executed.
of 1